Utah statutes.
53-10-202.   Criminal identification -- Duties of bureau.
The bureau shall:
(1)  procure and file information relating to identification and activities of
persons who:
(a)  are fugitives from justice;
(b)  are wanted or missing;
(c)  have been arrested for or convicted of a crime under the laws of any
state or nation; and
(d)  are believed to be involved in racketeering, organized crime, or a
dangerous offense;
(2)  establish a statewide uniform crime reporting system that shall include:
(a)  statistics concerning general categories of criminal activities;
(b)  statistics concerning crimes that exhibit evidence of prejudice based on
race, religion, ancestry, national origin, ethnicity, or other categories that
the division finds appropriate; and
(c)  other statistics as required by the Federal Bureau of Investigation;
(3)  make a complete and systematic record and index of the information
obtained under this part;
(4)  subject to the restrictions in this part, establish policy concerning the
use and dissemination of data obtained under this part;
(5)  publish an annual report concerning the extent, fluctuation,
distribution, and nature of crime in Utah;
(6)  establish a statewide central register for the identification and
location of missing persons, which may include:
(a)  identifying data including fingerprints of each missing person;
(b)  identifying data of any missing person who is reported as missing to a
law enforcement agency having jurisdiction;
(c)  dates and circumstances of any persons requesting or receiving
information from the register; and
(d)  any other information, including blood types and photographs found
necessary in furthering the purposes of this part;
(7)  publish a quarterly directory of missing persons for distribution to
persons or entities likely to be instrumental in the identification and
location of missing persons;
(8)  list the name of every missing person with the appropriate nationally
maintained missing persons lists;
(9)  establish and operate a 24-hour communication network for reports of
missing persons and reports of sightings of missing persons;
(10)  coordinate with the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children
and other agencies to facilitate the identification and location of missing
persons and the identification of unidentified persons and bodies;
(11)  receive information regarding missing persons, as provided in Sections
26-2-27 and 53A-11-502, and stolen vehicles, vessels, and outboard motors, as
provided in Section 41-1a-1401;
(12)  adopt systems of identification, including the fingerprint system, to be
used by the division to facilitate law enforcement;
(13)  assign a distinguishing number or mark of identification to any pistol
or revolver, as provided in Section 76-10-520; and
(14)  check certain criminal records databases for information regarding motor
vehicle salesperson applicants, maintain a separate file of fingerprints for
motor vehicle salespersons, and inform the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division
when new entries are made for certain criminal offenses for motor vehicle
salespersons in accordance with the requirements of Section 41-3-205.5.
